New York, session 2025-2026, A453.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 609-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 609-a. Publishing of common data sets. 1. As used in this section: 4 (a) "Common data set" shall refer to the survey created by the Common 5 Data Set Initiative, and completed by colleges, pertaining to such 6 college's admissions and financial aid process, annual expenses, academ- 7 ic offerings, graduation rate, student demographics, instructional 8 faculty and class sizes, degrees conferred, and more. 9 (b) "Drop-down menu" shall refer to a graphical control element that 10 allows a user of a website to choose one value from a list. 11 2. Each college in this state shall be required to complete, publish, 12 and prominently display such college's responses to the common data set 13 survey on an annual basis on such college's website. 14 3. (a) The commissioner shall compile the responses to the common data 15 set survey from each college in this state and publish such responses in 16 a clear and prominent location on the department's website. 17 (b) In compiling and publishing such responses, the commissioner shall 18 ensure that a user of such website is able to select and view such 19 responses for an individual college via a drop-down menu. 20 (c) The commissioner shall further represent such responses to the 21 common data set survey on a digital statewide map that allows a user to 22 select and view each college and such college's responses based on the 23 geographic location of such college. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02539-01-5 A. 453 2 1 (d) The commissioner shall also ensure that website users are able to 2 find responses for individual colleges via a search function. 3 4. The commissioner shall have the discretion to set civil penalties 4 for any college which willfully violates the provisions of this section. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 6 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 7 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 8 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 9 on or before such effective date.